Utah statutes.
76-8-413.   Stealing, destroying or mutilating public records by one not custodian.

Every person, not an officer such as is referred to in the preceding section, who is guilty of any of the acts specified in that section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

